District of Columbia statutes.
42-2706.02

Severability.

If any section, subsection, subdivision, paragraph, sentence, clause, or provision of this chapter shall be unconstitutional or ineffective, in whole or in part, to the extent that it is not unconstitutional or ineffective it shall be valid and effective, and no other section, subsection, subdivision, paragraph, sentence, clause, or provision shall on account thereof be deemed invalid or ineffective.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 602, 25 DCR 5008
1973 Ed., § 45-1932.
1981 Ed., § 45-2162.